Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2501
Department of Health and Human Services; establish program to provide stipends; funding; application process.

To facilitate improved quality in the work of employees providing child welfare services, the Department of Health and Human Services, in collaboration with accredited social work education programs at Nebraska's colleges and universities, shall establish a program to provide stipends for undergraduate and graduate social work students enrolled in such colleges and universities who are committed to working in the field of child welfare services. Funds available under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act, as such act existed on January 1, 2015, shall be used to pay for such stipends. The department and the governing boards of such colleges and universities shall develop an application process for eligible students and, based on the amount of funds available, shall determine the amount of such stipend to be awarded to each eligible student. The department and the governing boards may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2015, LB199, § 1.